California, session 20252026, AB2003.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 216 of the Education Code is amended to read:216. (a) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall, in consultation with the department and the State Department of Public Health, develop an evidence based online training program that is accessible, free of charge, and available statewide to train school staff serving pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, pupils who are 13 years of age or older, and parents, guardians, or caregivers of pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as part of the local educational agency’s policy on pupil suicide prevention adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 215.(b) In developing an online training program pursuant to subdivision (a), the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall ensure all of the following:(1) The training program is evidence based, trauma informed, and culturally and linguistically competent.(2) The training program is consistent with the model pupil suicide prevention policy developed by the department pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 215.(3) The training program addresses the needs of high-risk groups as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 215.(4) The training program can track aggregate, statewide usage.(5) The training program can assess trainee knowledge before and after training is provided in order to measure training outcomes.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.SEC. 2. Section 216.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:216.5. (a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(b) A local educational agency that conducts suicide risk screenings, including as provided under a school-linked behavioral health program or the local educational agency’s policy on pupil suicide prevention adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 215, shall report, on or before June 30, 2027, and June 30 annually thereafter, the number of pupils screened, and which screening instruments were used, for the reporting year, to the department. This section shall not be construed to require a local educational agency to conduct suicide risk screenings.(c) In collecting and reporting data pursuant to subdivision (b), the local educational agency shall ensure that data is reported in a deidentified, aggregate format that protects pupil privacy consistent with state and federal data privacy laws.(d) The department shall compile the data reported pursuant to this section through existing data reporting processes and post statewide aggregate data on its internet website to inform policy and program development.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To ensure that the training required in Section 216 of the Education Code is developed expeditiously for use by local educational agencies as part of their suicide prevention efforts, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.